District of Columbia statutes.
1-1202

Term of office.

Said notaries public shall hold their offices for the period of 5 years, removable at discretion.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1279, ch. 854, § 559

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1201.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-802.
1973 Ed., § 1-502.